Wisconsin, session 2025, SB497.
do enact as follows:SB497,11Section 1. 32.05 (2) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 32.05 (2) (b) 1. (intro.) 2and amended to read:SB497,2,4332.05 (2) (b) 1. (intro.) The condemnor shall provide the owner with a all of 4the following:SB497,2,55a. A full narrative appraisal upon which the jurisdictional offer is based and a.SB497,2,76b. A copy of any other appraisal made under par. (a) and at the same time 7shall inform the owner of his or her.SB497,2,98c. A notification of the right to obtain an appraisal under this paragraph subd. 93.SB497,2,16103. The owner may obtain an appraisal by a qualified appraiser of all property 11proposed to be acquired, and may submit the reasonable costs of the appraisal to 12the condemnor for payment. The owner shall submit a full narrative appraisal to 13the condemnor within 60 days after the owner receives the condemnor’s appraisal. 14If the owner does not accept a negotiated offer under sub. (2a) or the jurisdictional 15offer under sub. (3), the owner may use an appraisal prepared under this paragraph 16in any subsequent appeal.SB497,217Section 2. 32.05 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB497,3,21832.05 (2) (b) 2. An appraisal in which the amount of the owner’s appraised 19loss is less than 85 percent or more than 115 percent of the amount of the owner’s 1loss provided in the jurisdictional offer is not an appraisal upon which the 2jurisdictional offer is based within the meaning of subd. 1. a.SB497,33Section 3. 32.05 (3) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB497,3,10432.05 (3) (e) Stating that the appraisal or one of the appraisals of the property 5on which condemnor’s offer is based is available for inspection at a specified place 6by persons having an interest in the lands sought to be acquired. An appraisal in 7which the amount of the owner’s appraised loss is less than 85 percent or more than 8115 percent of the amount of the owner’s loss provided in the jurisdictional offer is 9not an appraisal upon which the jurisdictional offer is based within the meaning of 10this paragraph.SB497,411Section 4. 32.09 (6m) of the statutes is created to read:SB497,3,141232.09 (6m) In the taking of a sign, as defined in s. 84.30 (2) (j), all of the 13following apply, regardless of whether the sign is considered a legally permitted 14sign or a nonconforming sign under s. 84.30:SB497,3,1715(a) For a sign owned by someone other than the owner of the fee property, the 16compensation paid by the condemnor is not limited to the compensation for the 17undivided value of the property as a whole.SB497,3,1818(b) The owners of the property interest taken shall be paid all of the following:SB497,3,19191. The value of the sign and any lease related to the sign.SB497,3,20202. Loss in value to other signs of the owner caused by the removal of the sign.SB497,3,22213. With regard to the owner of the real property on which the sign is located, 22the loss of the right to erect and maintain the sign.SB497,4,923(c) Compensation required under par. (b) shall be paid to the person entitled 24thereto. The just compensation payable under par. (b) 1. and 2. shall be paid 1directly to the owner of such removed sign and the just compensation payable under 2par. (b) 3. shall be paid directly to the owner of the real property on which the sign 3is located. If the condemnor and the owner reach agreement on the amount of 4compensation payable to such owner in respect to any removal or relocation, the 5condemnor may pay such compensation to the owner and thereby require or 6terminate the owner’s rights or interests by purchase. If the condemnor and the 7owner do not reach agreement as to such amount of compensation, the condemnor 8or owner may institute an action to have such compensation determined under s. 932.05.SB497,4,1610(d) If the condemnor and the owner do not reach agreement as to such amount 11of compensation, the condemnor and one or more owners may institute an action to 12have such compensation determined under s. 32.05. Notwithstanding the language 13included in s. 32.05, separate appeals may be filed and maintained under that 14section in relation to the compensation payable under par. (b). A successful owner 15litigant under this subsection shall be entitled to recover litigation expenses 16provided that the owner satisfies the requirements of s. 32.28 (3).SB497,517Section 5. 84.30 (5r) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB497,4,191884.30 (5r) (title) Signs nonconforming under local ordinances that are 19realigned because of state affected by certain highway projects.SB497,620Section 6. 84.30 (5r) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 84.30 (5r) (a) (intro.) 21and amended to read:SB497,4,232284.30 (5r) (a) (intro.) In this subsection, “realignment” means relocation on 23the same site.:SB497,724Section 7. 84.30 (5r) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB497,5,3184.30 (5r) (a) 1. “Covered project” means a highway project undertaken by the 2department or a political subdivision for which the department has allocated state 3or federal funds.SB497,84Section 8. 84.30 (5r) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB497,5,7584.30 (5r) (a) 2. “Lead agency” means the department, for a highway project 6undertaken by the department, or the political subdivision, for a highway project 7undertaken by a political subdivision.SB497,98Section 9. 84.30 (5r) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB497,5,9984.30 (5r) (a) 3. “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB497,1010Section 10. 84.30 (5r) (a) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB497,5,121184.30 (5r) (a) 4. “Reposition” means to raise, lower, rotate, or adjust or to move 12to another location.SB497,1113Section 11. 84.30 (5r) (b) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB497,5,181484.30 (5r) (b) If a sign does not conform to an ordinance of a political 15subdivision and a covered project causes the removal of the sign or reduces the 16visibility of the sign, the sign’s nonconforming status under the ordinance is not 17affected if the sign is repositioned in the political subdivision in any manner 18approved by the political subdivision.SB497,1219Section 12. 84.30 (5r) (bs) of the statutes is created to read:SB497,5,212084.30 (5r) (bs) All of the following apply to a sign that is repositioned under 21this subsection:SB497,5,23221. The size of the sign face and the number of sign faces on the sign after 23repositioning shall be the same as on the sign before repositioning.SB497,6,412. a. The height of the sign after repositioning may be different than the 2height of the sign before repositioning, but only to the extent necessary to provide 3substantially the same view of the sign from the roadway from which motorists are 4intended to view the sign as it existed before the covered project.SB497,6,85b. If the height of a sign is increased due to a covered project and the impact of 6the covered project on the sign terminates upon the completion of the covered 7project, a political subdivision may require a sign owner to reduce the height of a 8sign to its original height after the covered project is completed.SB497,6,119c. This section does not prohibit a political subdivision from requiring that a 10repositioned sign comply with an ordinance that establishes a maximum height of 11the sign.SB497,6,14123. Except as provided in subds. 1. and 2., the characteristics of the sign after 13repositioning shall be the same as the characteristics of the sign before 14repositioning. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb497 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb497 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB497 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB497 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB497: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting